Georgia statutes. TITLE 7 Banking And Finance
PART 10 Shareholders

Law reviews.

For comment, “A Snapshot of Dual-Class Share Structures in the Twenty-First Century:
A Solution to Reconcile Shareholder Protections with Founder Autonomy,” see 68 Emory L.J. 337 (2018).

7-1-430.
Liability of subscribers and shareholders.

Except as otherwise provided in this Code section, a holder of or subscriber to shares of a bank or trust company shall be under no obligation to the bank or trust company or its creditors with respect to such shares or subscription other than the obligation to pay the full consideration remaining due to the company upon such shares or subscription. Such obligation may be enforced by the bank or trust company and its successors or assigns, or by a shareholder suing derivatively, or by a receiver appointed under this chapter.

Every subscriber for shares not fully paid and every original holder of shares not fully paid which were issued contrary to Code Section 7-1-417 and every transferee or assignee of a subscription for shares or of shares with knowledge or notice that the shares are not fully paid and were issued contrary to Code Section 7-1-417 shall continue personally liable thereon as provided in subsection (a) of this Code section, notwithstanding any transfer or assignment of such shares or subscription for such shares.

Any person becoming a transferee or assignee of shares or of a subscription for shares in good faith and without knowledge or notice that the full consideration therefor has not been paid shall not be personally liable thereon for any unpaid portion of such consideration.

An executor, administrator, conservator, guardian, trustee, assignee for the benefit of creditors, receiver, or other fiduciary shall not be personally liable to the bank or trust company or its creditors as a holder of or subscriber for its shares; but the estate and funds in his hands or under his control shall be so liable. Nothing in the foregoing shall relieve any fiduciary from liability for a breach of trust.

No bailee or nominee and no pledgee or other holder of shares as collateral security shall be personally liable as a shareholder, but the bailor or real party in interest or pledgor or other person transferring such shares as collateral shall be considered the holder thereof for purposes of liability under this Code section.

No liability under this Code section shall be asserted against a subscriber or shareholder more than six years after the date on which the shares for which payment is sought were to have been fully paid pursuant to the contract of sale or subscription agreement or, if no such date is provided for in the contract of sale or subscription agreement, more than six years from the date of the contract of sale or subscription agreement, whether or not such contract or agreement is under seal.

The subscription agreement or contract of sale may prescribe other penalties for failure to make payments when due; but no penalty working a forfeiture of a subscription, or of the amounts paid thereon, shall be declared as against any subscriber unless the amount due thereon shall remain unpaid for a period of 20 days after written demand has been made therefor. The delinquent subscriber or his legal representative shall be entitled to be paid the excess of the sale proceeds realized from the sale by the bank or trust company of such subscribed shares over the sum of:

The amount due and unpaid on the subscription; and

The reasonable expenses incurred in selling the shares;

but in no event shall the delinquent subscriber or his legal representative be entitled to be paid an amount greater than the amount paid by said subscriber on his subscription.

The board of directors shall have power to compromise, on such terms and conditions as the board may prescribe, any claim, dispute, or action arising out of a subscription for shares when in the judgment of the board it is in the best interests of the bank or trust company to do so.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 18, §§ 1, 4; Ga. L. 1925, p. 119, § 1; Code 1933, §§ 13-1901, 13-1904; Ga. L. 1935, p. 103, § 1; Ga. L. 1937, p. 429, § 1; Code 1933, § 41A-2001, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

7-1-431.
Preemptive rights.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section or in the articles, a bank or trust company shall issue shares, option rights, or securities having conversion or option rights by first offering them to shareholders of the same class in proportion to their holdings of shares of such class.

Except as provided in the articles, there shall be no preemptive right to:

Shares issued as a share dividend;

Fractional shares;

Shares issued pursuant to share plans authorized by subsection (e) of Code Section 7-1-488;

Shares issued pursuant to acquisition of substantially all of the assets of another bank or trust company;

Shares released by waiver from their preemptive right by the affirmative vote or written consent of the holders of two-thirds of the shares of the class to be issued. Any such vote or consent shall be binding on all shareholders and their transferees for the time specified in such vote or consent up to but not exceeding one year from the date thereof and shall protect the bank or trust company, its management, and all persons who may within such time acquire the shares so released;

Shares which have been offered to shareholders to satisfy their preemptive right but not purchased by them within the prescribed time and which are thereafter issued or sold to any other person or persons at a price not less than the price at which they were offered to such shareholders.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles, no holder of shares of any class shall have any preemptive right with respect to shares of any other class which may be issued or sold by the bank or trust company.

Nothing in this Code section shall impair any cause of action or remedy which any shareholder may have for a breach of duty by the board of directors relating to the sale or other disposition by the bank or trust company of shares or securities not subject to the preemptive rights under this Code section or under the articles.

The holders of shares entitled to the preemptive rights shall be given prompt notice setting forth the time within which and the terms and conditions upon which such shareholders may exercise their preemptive rights. Such notice shall be given at least 30 days prior to the expiration of the period during which the rights may be exercised.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 9, § 9; Ga. L. 1920, p. 102, § 1; Code 1933, § 13-1009; Ga. L. 1965, p. 496, § 1; Ga. L. 1966, p. 590, § 5; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1045, § 5; Code 1933, § 41A-2002, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

7-1-432.
Meetings of shareholders.

Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, meetings of the shareholders of a bank or trust company shall be held in person at such place within or without the state as shall be fixed by the bylaws or by the board of directors pursuant to the bylaws or, if not so fixed, at the main office of the bank or trust company.

Shareholders may participate and vote remotely at meetings of the shareholders if the bylaws of the bank or trust company explicitly provide an option for remote participation and voting. If the bylaws so provide, the board of directors shall:

Implement reasonable measures to:

Provide shareholders a reasonable opportunity to remotely participate in such meetings. Such measures may include, but are not limited to, audio webcast or other broadcast of the meeting but, in every instance, shall provide shareholders the ability to communicate substantially concurrently with the proceedings;

Enable shareholders to vote or grant proxies at such meetings by means of electronic communication. Such measures may include, but are not limited to, telephonic or internet voting; and

Verify that each person deemed present and permitted to vote remotely is a shareholder of record in order to ensure the integrity of the vote;

Provide the option for remote participation and voting at no cost to shareholders; and

Keep a record of remote attendance by shareholders and any vote or other action taken by a shareholder participating remotely.

In the event of a proclaimed emergency pursuant to Code Section 7-1-111, the board of directors may apply to the department for authorization to conduct a meeting of the shareholders solely through remote participation. If such application is approved by the department, the board of directors shall comply with the requirements in paragraph (2) of this subsection.

There shall be at least one meeting of the shareholders in each calendar year for the election of directors. In addition, any matter relating to the bank or trust company, whether or not stated in the notice of meeting, may be brought up for action, except matters which this chapter requires to be stated in the notice of meeting. The time of such annual meeting shall be fixed by the bylaws or by the board of directors pursuant to the bylaws. If the annual meeting shall not be called and held during any calendar year, the principal court may, after notice to the bank or trust company, order a substitute annual meeting to be held upon the application of any shareholder. The principal court may issue such orders as may be appropriate, including, without limitation, orders designating the time and place of such meeting, the record date for determination of shareholders entitled to vote, and the form of notice of such meeting.

Special meetings of the shareholders or a special meeting in lieu of the annual meeting of the shareholders may be called by the president, the chairman of the board of directors, the board of directors, or such other officers or persons as may be provided in the articles or bylaws or, in the event there are no officers or directors, then by any shareholder. Special meetings of the shareholders or a special meeting in lieu of the annual meeting of the shareholders shall be called by the bank or trust company upon the written request of the holders of not less than 25 percent of the outstanding shares of the bank or trust company entitled to vote in an election of directors.

Notice of annual and special meetings shall be given to shareholders of record pursuant to Code Section 7-1-6. But when a meeting is adjourned to another time or place, it shall not be necessary, unless the bylaws require otherwise, to give any notice of the adjourned meeting if the time and place to which the meeting is adjourned are announced at the meeting at which the adjournment is taken; and at the adjourned meeting any business may be transacted that might have been transacted on the original date of the meeting. If, however, after the adjournment the board fixes a new record date for the adjourned meeting, a notice of the adjourned meeting shall be given each shareholder of record on the new record date entitled to vote at such meeting.

Any action required by this chapter to be taken at a meeting of the shareholders of a bank or trust company, or any action which may be taken at a meeting of the shareholders, may be taken without a meeting if written consent setting forth the action so taken shall be signed by all the shareholders entitled to vote with respect to the subject matter thereof. Such consent shall have the same force and effect as a unanimous vote of shareholders and may be stated as such in any articles or document filed with the Secretary of State or the department under this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1898, p. 78, § 6; Civil Code 1910, § 2818; Ga. L. 1917, p. 62, § 1; Ga. L. 1919, p. 191, art. 19, § 1; Code 1933, §§ 13-2001, 109-103; Ga. L. 1947, p. 476, § 1; Ga. L. 1947, p. 480, § 1; Ga. L. 1966, p. 590, § 6; Code 1933, § 41A-2003, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 795, § 19; Ga. L. 2021, p. 323, § 5/HB 111; Ga. L. 2022, p. 352, § 7/HB 1428.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, designated the existing provisions of subsection (a) as paragraph (a)(1); in paragraph (a)(1), substituted “Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, meetings of the” for “Meetings of the” at the beginning and inserted “in person”; and added paragraphs (a)(2) and (a)(3).

The 2022 amendment,

effective May 2, 2022, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “Code Section” for “Code section” in paragraph (a)(3).

7-1-433.
Closing of transfer books or fixing record date.

For the purpose of determining shareholders entitled to notice of or to vote at any meeting of shareholders or any adjournment thereof, or entitled to receive payment of any dividend, or in order to make a determination of shareholders for any other proper purpose, the board of directors of a bank or trust company may provide that the stock transfer books shall be closed for a stated period not to exceed, in any case, 70 days. If the stock transfer books shall be closed for the purpose of determining shareholders entitled to notice of or to vote at a meeting of shareholders, such books shall be closed for at least ten days immediately preceding such meeting.

In lieu of closing the stock transfer books, the bylaws or, in the absence of an applicable bylaw, the board of directors may fix in advance a date as the record date for any such determination of shareholders, such date in any case to be not more than 70 days and, in case of a meeting of shareholders, not less than ten days prior to the date on which the particular action requiring such determination of shareholders is to be taken.

If the stock transfer books are not closed and no record date is fixed for the determination of shareholders entitled to notice of or to vote at a meeting of shareholders or shareholders entitled to receive payment of a dividend, the date on which notice of the meeting is mailed, or the date on which the resolution of the board of directors declaring such dividend is adopted, as the case may be, shall be the record date for such determination of stockholders.

When a determination of shareholders entitled to vote at any meeting of shareholders has been made, as provided in this Code section, such determination shall apply to any adjournment thereof, unless the board of directors fixes a new record date under this Code section for the adjourned meeting.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-2004, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 826, § 9/SB 82.

7-1-434.
Voting list.

The officer or agent having charge of the stock transfer books for shares of a bank or trust company shall make a complete list of the shareholders entitled to vote at a meeting of shareholders or any adjournment thereof, arranged in alphabetical order, showing the address of each shareholder and the number and class, if any, of shares held by each shareholder. Such list shall be produced and kept open at the time and place of the meeting and shall be subject to the inspection of any shareholder during the whole time of the meeting for the purposes thereof. Such list shall be prima-facie evidence of who is a shareholder of record; but, in the event of challenge, the record of shareholders required by Code Section 7-1-439 shall control.

If the requirements of this Code section have not been substantially complied with, the meeting shall, on the demand of any shareholder in person or by proxy, be adjourned until the requirements are complied with.

If no such demand is made, failure to comply with the requirements of this Code section shall not affect the validity of any action taken at such meeting.

Notwithstanding subsections (a) through (c) of this Code section, it shall not be necessary to prepare or produce a list of shareholders in any case where the record of shareholders is presented and readily shows, in alphabetical order or by alphabetical index and by classes, if any, the names of the shareholders entitled to vote, with the address of and the number of shares held by each.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-2005, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1977, p. 730, § 6.

7-1-435.
Quorum of shareholders.

Except as provided in subsection (d) of this Code section or the articles or in bylaws adopted by the shareholders, a majority of the shares entitled to vote, represented in person or by proxy, shall constitute a quorum at a meeting of shareholders.

If a quorum is present, the affirmative vote of the majority of the shares represented at the meeting and entitled to vote on the subject matter shall be the act of the shareholders, unless the vote of a greater number, or voting by classes, is required by this chapter, or the articles, or bylaws.

When a quorum is once present to organize a meeting, the shareholders present may continue to do business at the meeting or at any adjournment thereof, notwithstanding the withdrawal of enough shareholders to leave less than a quorum.

If a meeting cannot be organized for lack of a quorum, those present may adjourn the meeting to such time and place as they may determine. In the case of a meeting for the election of directors which is twice adjourned for lack of a quorum, those present at the second of such adjourned meetings, of which notice has been given in writing to shareholders pursuant to Code Section 7-1-6, shall constitute a quorum for the election of directors without regard to the other quorum requirements of this Code section, the articles, or bylaws.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-2006, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

7-1-436.
Voting of shares.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles, each outstanding share entitled to vote, regardless of class, shall be entitled to one vote on each matter submitted to a vote at a meeting of shareholders. A subscriber shall not be entitled to vote the share subscribed for until such shares have been fully paid.

Treasury shares shall not be voted at any meeting nor counted in determining the total number of outstanding shares at any given time.

The chairman of the board, chief executive officer, president, any vice-president, the secretary, or the treasurer of a corporation which is the holder of record of shares of a bank or trust company shall be deemed by the bank or trust company to have authority to vote such shares and to execute proxies and written waivers and consents in relation thereto, whether such shares are held in a fiduciary capacity or otherwise, unless, before a vote is taken or a waiver of consent is acted upon, it is made to appear by a certified copy of the bylaws or resolution of the board of directors or executive committee of the corporation holding such shares that such authority does not exist or is vested in some other officer or person. In the absence of such certification, a person executing any such proxies, waivers, or consents or presenting himself or herself at a meeting as one of such officers of a corporate shareholder shall, for the purposes of this Code section, be prima facie deemed to be duly elected, qualified, and acting as such officer and to be fully authorized; and, in the case of conflicting representation, the corporate shareholder shall be deemed to be represented by its senior officer in the order first stated in this subsection.

Shares held by an administrator, executor, guardian, or conservator may be voted by him, either in person or by proxy, without a transfer of such shares into his name. Shares standing in the name of a trustee may be voted by him, either in person or by proxy; but no trustee shall be entitled to vote shares held by him without a transfer of such shares into his name or the name of his nominee. Shares standing in the name of a person as life tenant may be voted by him, either in person or by proxy, unless the record of shareholders shows that he is not entitled to vote such shares.

Shares standing in the name of a receiver may be voted by such receiver; and shares held by or under the control of a receiver may be voted by such receiver without a transfer thereof into his name if authority to do so is contained in an order of the court by which such receiver was appointed.

If a share or shares stand of record in the names of two or more persons, whether fiduciaries, joint tenants, tenants in common, tenants in partnership, or otherwise, or if two or more persons have the same fiduciary relationship respecting the same share or shares, then unless the instrument or order appointing them or creating the tenancy otherwise directs and such instrument or order or a copy thereof is filed with the secretary of the bank or trust company, their acts with respect to voting shall have the following effect:

If only one votes, in person or by proxy, his act binds all;

If more than one votes, in person or by proxy, the act of the majority so voting binds all;

If more than one votes in person or by proxy but the votes are evenly split on any particular matter, each faction is entitled to vote the share or shares in question proportionally;

If the instrument or order so filed shows that any such tenancy is held in unequal interest, a majority or even-split for purposes of this subsection shall be a majority or even-split in interest;

The principles of this subsection shall apply, insofar as possible, to execution of proxies, waivers, consents, or objections and for the purpose of ascertaining the presence of a quorum.

A shareholder whose shares are pledged shall be entitled to vote such shares until the shares have been transferred into the name of the pledgee, or a nominee of the pledgee; and thereafter the pledgee or his nominee shall be entitled to vote the shares so transferred.

Notwithstanding subsections (a) through (g) of this Code section, a corporation shall be protected from liability in relying on and treating the persons in whose names shares stand on the record of shareholders as the owners thereof for all purposes.

When notice of redemption of redeemable shares has been mailed to the holders thereof and a sum sufficient to redeem such shares has been set aside to pay the redemption price to shareholders, such shares shall not be entitled to vote in any manner and shall not be deemed to be outstanding shares.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-2007, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 7-9/HB 811.

7-1-437.
Proxies.

Unless otherwise unlawful, a person or corporation who is entitled to attend a shareholders’ meeting, to vote thereat, or to execute consents, waivers, or releases may be represented at such meeting or vote thereat, and execute consents, waivers, and releases, and exercise any of his or her other rights, by one or more agents, who may be either an individual or individuals or any domestic or foreign corporation, authorized by a written proxy or electronic transmission of proxy executed by such person or by his or her attorney in fact.

No proxy shall be valid after the expiration of 11 months from the date thereof unless otherwise provided in the proxy. Every proxy shall be revocable at the pleasure of the person executing it, except as otherwise provided in this Code section.

Subject to the limitation of subsection (b) of this Code section, any proxy duly executed is not revoked and continues in full force and effect until an instrument revoking it, or a duly executed proxy bearing a later date, is received by the secretary of the bank or trust company. A proxy is not revoked by the death or incapacity of the maker unless, before the vote is counted or the authority is exercised, written notice of such death or incapacity is received by the secretary of the bank or trust company. Notwithstanding that a valid proxy is outstanding, the powers of the proxyholder are suspended, except in the case of a valid proxy which is by law irrevocable and which states on its face that it is irrevocable, if the maker is present at the meeting and elects to vote in person.

If a proxy for the same shares confers authority upon two or more persons and does not otherwise provide, a majority of them present at the meeting or, if only one is present, then that one may exercise all the powers conferred by the proxy; but, if the proxyholders present at the meeting are divided as to the right and manner of voting in any particular case and there is no majority, the voting of said shares shall be prorated.

If a proxy expressly provides, any proxyholder may, unless otherwise unlawful, appoint in writing a substitute to act in his or her place.

A shareholder shall not sell his or her vote or issue a proxy to vote to any person for any sum of money or anything of value, except as permitted in this Code section and in Code Section 7-1-438, relating to shareholders’ agreements.

To be irrevocable, a proxy must be entitled “IRREVOCABLE PROXY,” must state that it is irrevocable, must not otherwise be unlawful, and must be held by any of the following or by a nominee of any of the following:

A pledge or other person holding a security interest in the shares;

A person who has purchased or agreed to purchase the shares;

A creditor or creditors of the bank or trust company who extend or continue credit to the bank or trust company in consideration of the proxy, if the proxy states that it was given in consideration of such extension or continuation of credit, the amounts thereof, and the name of the person extending or continuing credit;

A person who has contracted to perform services as an officer of the bank or trust company, if a proxy is required by the contract of employment and if the proxy states that it was given in consideration of such contract of employment, the name of the employee, and the period of employment contracted for;

A person designated by or under an agreement under Code Section 7-1-438, relating to shareholders’ agreements.

Notwithstanding a provision in a proxy stating that it is irrevocable, the proxy becomes revocable after the pledge or security interest is redeemed, or the debt of the bank or trust company is paid, or the period of employment provided for in the contract of employment has terminated, or the agreement under Code Section 7-1-438, relating to shareholders’ agreements, has terminated; and, in a case provided for in paragraph (3) or (4) of subsection (g) of this Code section, a proxy becomes revocable three years after the date of the proxy or at the end of the period, if any, specified therein, whichever period is less, unless the period of irrevocability is renewed from time to time by the execution of a new irrevocable proxy as provided in this Code section. This subsection does not affect the duration of a proxy under subsection (b) of this Code section.

A proxy may be revoked, notwithstanding a provision making it irrevocable, by a purchaser of shares without knowledge of the existence of the provision unless the existence of the proxy and its irrevocability are noted conspicuously on the face or back of the certificate representing such shares.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-2008, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 445, § 24; Ga. L. 2007, p. 502, § 3/SB 70; Ga. L. 2010, p. 878, § 7/HB 1387.

7-1-438.
Shareholders’ agreements.

Unless otherwise unlawful, an agreement between two or more shareholders, if in writing and signed by the parties thereto and if a copy thereof is delivered to the department and approved by the department when, in its discretion, such agreement is in the best interest of the bank and the public, may provide that in exercising any voting rights the shares held by them shall be voted as therein provided, or as they may agree, or as determined in accordance with a procedure agreed upon by them. Nothing herein shall impair the right of the bank or trust company to treat the shareholders of record as entitled to vote the shares standing in their names.

The duration of any agreement permitted by subsection (a) of this Code section shall not exceed 20 years. Failure to state a period of duration or stating a period of duration in excess of 20 years shall not invalidate the agreement, but in either such case the period of duration of the agreement shall be 20 years. Any such agreement shall be renewable at any time before the expiration of such 20 year period by agreement of all the shareholders bound thereby at the date of renewal.

A transferee of shares in a bank or trust company whose shareholders have entered into an agreement authorized by subsection (a) of this Code section shall be bound by such agreement or any renewal of such agreement authorized by subsection (b) of this Code section if he takes the shares with notice thereof. A transferee shall be deemed to have notice of any such agreement or any renewal if the existence thereof is noted on the face or back of the certificate or certificates representing such shares.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-2009, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 445, § 25.

7-1-439.
Books and records.

Each bank and trust company shall keep correct and complete books and records of account and shall keep minutes of the proceedings of its shareholders, board of directors, and committees of directors; and each bank and trust company shall keep at its registered office or main office or at the office of its transfer agent or registrar a record of its shareholders, giving the names and addresses of all shareholders and the number, class, and series, if any, of the shares held by each.

The department may, by regulation, prescribe the minimum disclosure of corporate records and reports which must be made by the bank or trust company to its shareholders at each annual meeting. In issuing such regulations, the department shall consider the legitimate rights of a shareholder to sufficient information to evaluate the management and use of his investment and to elect qualified directors for the bank or trust company as well as the rights of customers of the bank or trust company to maintain the confidentiality of their business affairs.

Nothing in this Code section shall impair the power of any court of competent jurisdiction, upon proof by a shareholder of proper purpose, irrespective of the period of time during which such shareholder shall have been a shareholder of record and irrespective of the number of shares held by him, to compel the production or examination by such shareholder of the books and records of account, minutes, and record of shareholders of a bank or trust company.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 19, § 4; Code 1933, § 13-2004; Code 1933, § 41A-2010, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 445, § 26; Ga. L. 1998, p. 795, § 20; Ga. L. 2004, p. 631, § 7.

7-1-440.
Derivative actions by shareholders; when proper.

A derivative action may be brought by a shareholder in the right of the bank or trust company to procure a judgment in its favor against directors, officers, or other representatives of the bank or trust company, or shareholders, or third parties, or any combination thereof, whenever the bank or trust company has a claim or cause of action which the representatives of the bank or trust company, in violation of their duties, have failed to enforce, including a claim or cause of action against such representatives for their failure in this respect.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-2011, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

7-1-441.
Derivative actions by shareholders.

In a derivative action involving a right which a bank or trust company may have properly asserted, but which its representatives wrongfully failed to enforce that has been brought by one or more shareholders of a bank or trust company to procure a judgment in its favor, the complaint shall be verified and shall allege that the plaintiff is a shareholder of record at the time of bringing the action. It shall further allege:

That the plaintiff had purchased his or her shares or was a shareholder of record at the time of the transaction of which he or she complains or that his or her shares thereafter devolved on him or her through one or more transfers by operation of law from one who was a holder of record or member at such time; or

That the plaintiff is the holder of record of shares which at the time of the transaction of which he or she complains were held of record by a trustee of a trust in which the plaintiff held a beneficial interest or in which a beneficial interest was held by one from whom the shares have devolved upon the plaintiff through one or more transfers by operation of law.

In any such action the complaint shall also allege with particularity the efforts of the plaintiff to secure the initiation of such action by the board of directors or comparable authority, or the reasons for not making such effort.

Such action shall not be discontinued, compromised, or settled without the approval of the court having jurisdiction of the action. If the court shall determine that the interests of the members or of the shareholders of any class or classes will be substantially affected by such discontinuance, compromise, or settlement, the court shall direct that notice, by publication or otherwise, of the action and the proposed discontinuance, compromise, or settlement thereof be given to the members or to the shareholders of the class or classes whose interests it determines will be so affected; if notice is so directed to be given, the court may determine which one or more of the parties to the action shall bear the expense of giving the same in such amount as the court shall determine and find to be reasonable in the circumstances.

If such action is successful, in whole or in part, or if anything is received by the plaintiff or plaintiffs as the result of the judgment or compromise or settlement of the action, the court may award the plaintiff or plaintiffs reasonable expenses, including reasonable fees of attorneys, and shall direct him or them to account to the bank or trust company for the remainder of the proceeds so received by him or them.

In any such action, the court having jurisdiction, upon final judgment and a finding that the action was brought without reasonable cause, may require the plaintiff or plaintiffs to pay to the parties named as defendants the reasonable expenses, including fees of attorneys, incurred by them in the defense of such action; and such damages as the court may assess shall be paid to the bank or trust company for damages such bank or trust company may have sustained due to adverse publicity brought about as a result of action brought without reasonable cause.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-2012, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 445, § 27; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 7-10/HB 811.